test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xaqmasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - хаˮмась: # Verb 'to fall' - partial paradigm
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: хаˮмывˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: хаˮмын
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: хаˮмыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: хаˮмыниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: хаˮмыдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: хаˮмъяхаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: хаˮмынаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: хаˮмыдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: хаˮмыдˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg1: хаˮмываць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg2: хаˮмынась
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg3: хаˮмыць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu1: хаˮмынинзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu2: хаˮмыдинзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu3: хаˮмъяханзъ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl1: хаˮмынаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl2: хаˮмыдаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl3: хаˮмыдаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Hort+RcSg1: хаˮaмхавˮ 
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Hort+RcDu1: хаˮамханиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Hort+RcPl1: хаˮамханаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Imprt+RcSg2: хаˮмадˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Imprt+RcDu2: хаˮмыдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Imprt+RcPl2: хаˮмыдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Opt+RcSg3: хаˮмымдˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Opt+RcDu3: хаˮмъяхамдˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Opt+RcPl3: хаˮмыдамдˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg1:  хаˮамъивˮ # хаˮмаивˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg2:  хаˮамъин # хаˮмаин
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg3:  хаˮамъиˮ # хаˮмаиˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu1:  хаˮамъиниʼ # хаˮмаиниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu2:  хаˮамъидиʼ # хаˮмаидиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu3:  хаˮамъихаʼ # хаˮмаихаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl1:  хаˮамъинаˮ # хаˮмаинаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl2:  хаˮамъидаˮ # хаˮмаидаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl3:  хаˮамъидˮ # хаˮмаидˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg1: хаˮамъиваць # хаˮмаиваць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg2: хаˮамъинась # хаˮмаинась
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg3: хаˮамъиць # хаˮмаиць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu1: хаˮамъининзь # хаˮмаининзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu2: хаˮамъидинзь # хаˮмаидинзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu3: хаˮамъиханзь # хаˮмаиханзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl1: хаˮамъинаць # хаˮмаинаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl2: хаˮамъидаць # хаˮмаидаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl3: хаˮамъидаць # хаˮмаидаць  
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg1: хаˮмабцувˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg2: хаˮмабцун
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg3: хаˮмабцуˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu1: хаˮмабцуниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu2: хаˮмабцудиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu3: хаˮмабцухуʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl1: хаˮмабцунаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl2: хаˮмабцудаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl3: хаˮмабцудˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg1: хаˮмасявˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg1: хаˮмасивˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg2: хаˮмасян
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg2: хаˮмасин
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg3: хаˮмасяˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg3: хаˮмасиˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu1: хаˮмасяниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu1: хаˮмасиниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu2: хаˮмасядиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu2: хаˮмасидиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu3: хаˮмасяхаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu3: хаˮмасихаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl1: хаˮмасянаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl1: хаˮмасинаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl2: хаˮмасядаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl2: хаˮмасидаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl3: хаˮмасядˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl3: хаˮмасидˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg1: хаˮмавэвˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg2: хаˮмавэн
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg3: [хаˮмавыˮ, хаˮамвыˮ]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu1: хаˮамвыниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu2: хаˮамвыдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu3: хаˮамвэхэʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl1: хаˮамвынаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl2: хаˮамвыдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl3: хаˮамвыдˮ
 
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg1: хаˮмавэваць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg2: хаˮмавэнась
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg3: хаˮмавыць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu1: хаˮмавэнинзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu2: хаˮмавэдинзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu3: хаˮмавэханзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl1: хаˮмавэнаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl2: хаˮмавэдаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl3: хаˮмавыдаць
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg1: хаˮманакэвˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg2: хаˮманакэн
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg3: хаˮманакыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu1: хаˮманакэниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu2: хаˮманакэдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu3: хаˮманакэхэʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl1: хаˮманакэнаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl2: хаˮманакэдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl3: хаˮманакыдˮ 
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg1: хаˮманакэваць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg2: хаˮманакэнась
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg3: хаˮманакыць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu1: хаˮманакэнинзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu2: хаˮманакэдинзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu3: хаˮманакэхэнзь
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl1: хаˮманакэнаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl2: хаˮманакэдаць
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl3: хаˮманакыдаць
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg1: хаˮмавэкэвˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg2: хаˮмавэкэн
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg3: хаˮмавэкыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu1: хаˮмавэкэниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu2: хаˮмавэкэдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu3: хаˮмавэкэхэʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl1: хаˮмавэкэнаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl2: хаˮмавэкэдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl3: хаˮмавэкыдˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg1: хаˮмабцакэвˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg2: хаˮмабцакэн
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg3: хаˮмабцакыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu1: хаˮмабцакэниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu2: хаˮмабцакэдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu3: хаˮмабцакэхэʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl1: хаˮмабцакэнаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl2: хаˮмабцакэдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl3: хаˮмабцакыдˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcSg1: хаˮманархывˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcSg2: хаˮманархын
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcSg3: хаˮманархыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcDu1: хаˮманархыниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcDu2: хаˮманархыдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcDu3: хаˮманархыхаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcPl1: хаˮманархынаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcPl2: хаˮманархыдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/appr+Aor+RcPl3: хаˮманархыдˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg1: хаˮмавэрхывˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg2: хаˮмавэрхын
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg3: хаˮмавэрхыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu1: хаˮмавэрхыниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu2: хаˮмавэрхыдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu3: хаˮмавэрхыхаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl1: хаˮмавэрхынаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl2: хаˮмавэрхыдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl3: хаˮмавэрхыдˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg1: хаˮмавандархывˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg2: хаˮмавандархын
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg3: хаˮмавандархыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu1: хаˮмавандархыниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu2: хаˮмавандархыдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu3: хаˮмавандархыхаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl1: хаˮмавандархынаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl2: хаˮмавандархыдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl3: хаˮмавандархыдˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg1: хаˮмаванӈгабивˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg2: хаˮмаванӈгабин
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg3: хаˮмаванӈгабиˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu1: хаˮмаванӈгабиниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu2: хаˮмаванӈгабидиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu3: хаˮмаванӈгабихаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl1: хаˮмаванӈгабинаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl2: хаˮмаванӈгабидаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl3: хаˮмаванӈгабидˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg1: хаˮмарахавэвˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg2: хаˮмарахавэн
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg3: хаˮмарахавыˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu1: хаˮмарахавэниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu2: хаˮмарахавэдиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu3: хаˮмарахавэхэʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl1: хаˮмарахавэнаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl2: хаˮмарахавэдаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl3: хаˮмарахавыдˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg1: хаˮмавнавˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg2: хаˮмавнан
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg3: хаˮмавнаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu1: хаˮмавнаниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu2: хаˮмавнадиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu3: хаˮмавнахаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl1: хаˮмавнанаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl2: хаˮмавнадаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl3: хаˮмавнадˮ
     
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg1: хаˮмарбивˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg2: хаˮмарбин
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg3: хаˮмарбиˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu1: хаˮмарбиниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu2: хаˮмарбидиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu3: хаˮмарбихаʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl1: хаˮмарбинаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl2: хаˮмарбидаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl3: хаˮмарбидˮ
          
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+InfImprf: хаˮамва  
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+InfPrf: хаˮамˮма  
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+PrcImprf: хаˮамна
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+PrcPrf: хаˮамвы
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+PrcFut: хаˮамванда   
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+PrcNeg: хаˮамвдавэй
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Ger: [хаˮма, хаˮмась] 
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+GerFin: хаˮамванзь      
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord: хаˮмабˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Evas: хаˮмавоӈгад
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+ConNeg: хаˮамˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+ConNeg: хаˮамӈгуˮ   
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg1: [хаˮмабˮнани, хаˮамбаˮни]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg2: [хаˮмабˮнанд, хаˮамбат]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg3: [хаˮмабˮнанда, хаˮамбата] 
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu1: [хаˮмабˮнаниʼ, хаˮамбаˮниʼ]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu2: [хаˮмабˮнандиʼ, хаˮамбаˮтиʼ]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu3: [хаˮмабˮнандиʼ, хаˮамбаˮтиʼ]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl1: [хаˮмабˮнанаˮ, хаˮамбаˮнаˮ]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl2: [хаˮмабˮнандаˮ, хаˮамбатаˮ]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl3: [хаˮмабˮнандоʼ, хаˮамбатоʼ]
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: хаˮамӈгувˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: хаˮамӈгун
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: хаˮамӈгуˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: хаˮамӈгуниʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: хаˮамӈгудиʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: хаˮамӈгухуʼ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: хаˮамӈгунаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: хаˮамӈгудаˮ
     хаˮмась+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: хаˮамӈгудˮ
